Utah statutes.
53A-3-304.   Other board officers.

(1)  A board may appoint other necessary officers who serve at the pleasure of the board.  

(2)  These officers shall qualify by taking the constitutional oath of office before assuming office.



Amended by Chapter 336, 2011 General Session

